Massachusetts, session 194th, H3867.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 6B of chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 19, 28 and 35, the figure “$2,000” and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $5,000.